Massachusetts, session 194th, H4074.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 3 of chapter 40A of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 37 of 
chapter 239 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit, unreasonably restrict or require a special 
permit or other discretionary zoning approval for the use of land or structures for single or multi-
family dwellings that have: (i) a preference for housing veterans, as defined in clause Forty-third 
of section 7 of chapter 4; and (ii) an affordable housing deed restriction.